District of Columbia statutes.
42-2903

Community police presence.

All Metropolitan police officers who reside in the District of Columbia shall be eligible to keep in their possession at all times, overnight and off-duty, the official vehicles assigned for patrol purposes. In assigning police vehicles to be taken by police officers while off-duty, the Chief of Police shall establish priorities based on District residency, dispersion by geographic locations, and other factors the Chief of Police may deem appropriate.

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-70, § 4, 40 DCR 7575
1981 Ed., § 45-2233.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program and Community Safety Temporary Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-63, October 8, 1993, law notification 40 DCR ]).